California, session 20252026, SB2.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 39617.2 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:39617.2. Notwithstanding any other law, the final regulation order of the state board to amend the Low-Carbon Fuel Standard regulations (Subarticle 7 (commencing with Section 95480) of Article 4 of Subchapter 10 of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations) that adopts Sections 95486.3, 95486.4, and 95491.2 of, and amends Sections 95480, 95481, 95482, 95483, 95483.1, 95483.2, 95483.3, 95484, 95485, 95486, 95486.1, 95486.2, 95487, 95488, 95488.1, 95488.2, 95488.3, 95488.4, 95488.5, 95488.6, 95488.7, 95488.8, 95488.9, 95488.10, 95489, 95490, 95491, 95491.1, 95495, 95500, 95501, 95502, and 95503 of of, Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, as adopted on November 8, 2024, or as that final regulation order is subsequently rewritten and adopted by the state board in response to the Office of Administrative Law’s Notice of Disapproval of Regulatory Action in OAL Matter Number 2025-0103-01, is hereby void.SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:Californians need immediate relief from unnecessarily high gasoline prices that will be driven even higher by recent amendments to the Low-Carbon Fuel Standard regulations. California consistently leads the nation with the highest gasoline prices, largely driven by excessive government taxes, fees, and regulations, and it is estimated that these recent amendments to the Low-Carbon Fuel Standard regulations will increase the cost of a gallon of gasoline by sixty-five cents ($0.65) to eighty-five cents ($0.85). This will worsen the current affordability crisis and decimate our economy.